Rhode Island, session 2025, SB286.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 11-47 of the General Laws entitled "Weapons" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
11-47-65. Multiple firearm purchases prohibited.
(a) Except as provided pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, no person shall purchase
or take possession of more than one firearm in any thirty (30) day period. For purposes of this
section, "firearm" means any "pistol", "rifle" or "shotgun" as defined in § 11-47-2.
(b) The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to federally licensed
firearm dealers; governmental entities; any issuance of weapons by a governmental entity to
officers, agents or personnel of the governmental entity; law enforcement officers exempt pursuant
to the provisions of §§ 11-47-9 and 11-47-9.1; licensed private security companies for use by
registered armed security guards; any transfer pursuant to a court order; an estate representative or
heir in accordance with an authorization issued or ordered by a probate court; a temporary rental
or use of a firearm at a licensed shooting range or club; a participant in a training, firearm safety or
shooting course of instruction during the period of instruction; or a transfer of a weapon defined as
a curio or relic pursuant to 27 C.F.R. § 478.11 to a licensed curio or relic collector.
(c) Any person violating the provisions of subsection (a) of this section upon conviction
for a first offense shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and may be sentenced to a term of imprisonment
of not more than one year or fined five hundred dollars ($500), or both. Any person convicted of a
second or subsequent offense shall be guilty of a felony offense and may be sentenced to a period

of confinement not to exceed three (3) years or fined three thousand dollars ($3,000), or both.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000940
========
LC000940 - Page 2 of 3